Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.025

"Director" defined.

Unless the context clearly requires a different interpretation, whenever "director" is used in this chapter, it shall mean the director of financial management created in RCW 43.41.060.

[ 1979 c 151 s 136; 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 10.]